District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Public Trash and Recycling Container Budgeting Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Capital budget calculations to include the cost of secure trash and recycling
containers.
(a) Beginning in Fiscal Year 2027, when formulating a capital improvements plan budget
for a public school renovation or modernization, park renovation or modernization, recreation
center renovation or modernization, sidewalk replacement project, or curb extension project, the
Mayor shall include the cost of replacing existing public trash and recycling containers at or

immediately surrounding the project site with publicly accessible, front loading, secure, rodent-
resistant trash and recycling containers.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).